District of Columbia statutes.
31-1631.03

License requirement.

No person shall, directly or indirectly, act as a public insurance adjuster without first procuring a license from the Commissioner to act as a public insurance adjuster.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-256, § 3, 50 DCR 238